New York, session 2025-2026, A3843.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 1-0101 of 2 the environmental conservation law is designated paragraph a and a new 3 paragraph b is added to read as follows: 4 b. It is further the policy of the state of New York that all people, 5 regardless of race, culture, national origin, income, gender identity or 6 expression, disability, or community of residence, shall be treated 7 equally with respect to the development, implementation and enforcement 8 of environmental laws, regulations and policies. It is a basic right of 9 all New Yorkers to live and work in safe, healthful, productive and 10 aesthetically and culturally pleasing surroundings. This policy of envi- 11 ronmental justice is based on the concept of fundamental fairness that 12 all people should be free from any disproportionate exposure or risk of 13 exposure to pollution, and from the cumulative negative impacts result- 14 ing from the disparate concentration of polluted sites or environmental 15 facilities licensed, regulated or approved by state agencies, nor should 16 people be deprived of locally accessible open space or other environ- 17 mental benefits due to lack of political or economic strength. 18 § 2. The opening paragraph of subdivision 3 of section 1-0101 of the 19 environmental conservation law is amended to read as follows: 20 It shall further be the policy of the state to foster, promote, create 21 and maintain conditions under which [man] people and nature can thrive 22 in harmony with each other, and achieve social, economic and technolog- 23 ical progress for present and future generations by: 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06483-01-5